Hawaii, session 2025, HB870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of human services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, that expand eligibility for the State's medicaid programs to all children in the State from birth to age five years, with no income requirement. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $317,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for expanding eligibility for the State's medicaid programs to all children in the State from birth to age five years. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________